Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF908.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 7 TLSB 1992HV (3) 91 as/js H.F. 908 Section 1. Section 80.45, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . i. Hold an annual meeting of stakeholders to 3 develop legislative proposals to combat human trafficking, and 4 submit a report, by December 15, 2025, and annually thereafter 5 for a period of five years ending with the submission of 6 the report in 2030, to the governor and general assembly. 7 Participants shall include the following: 8 (1) A representative of the department of public safety. 9 (2) A representative of the office to combat human 10 trafficking. 11 (3) A representative of the attorney generalâs office. 12 (4) A representative of the department of health and human 13 services. 14 (5) A representative of juvenile court services. 15 (6) A chief of police or head law enforcement official of a 16 city in this state. 17 (7) A county sheriff. 18 (8) A county attorney who serves on a child protection 19 assistance team under section 915.35, subsection 4, paragraph 20 â aâ . 21 (9) A public defender or criminal law attorney with 22 experience working on human trafficking cases. 23 (10) A member of the public, or the personâs legal 24 representative, who is a former human trafficking victim. 25 (11) A representative from the Iowa network against human 26 trafficking. 27 (12) A representative from a nonprofit organization whose 28 primary focus is services for human trafficking survivors. 29 Sec. 2. Section 232.2, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 30 following new subsection: 31 NEW SUBSECTION . 7A. âCommercial sexual exploitationâ refers 32 to a range of crimes and activities involving the sexual abuse 33 or exploitation of a child for the financial benefit of any 34 person or in exchange for anything of value including monetary 35 -1- LSB 1992HV (3) 91 as/js 1/ 8 H.F. 908 and nonmonetary benefits given or received by any person. 1 Sec. 3. Section 232.28, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 2 to read as follows: 3 2. The Upon receiving a complaint under subsection 1, the 4 court or its designee shall refer do all of the following: 5 a. Refer the complaint to an intake officer who shall 6 consult with law enforcement authorities having knowledge of 7 the facts and conduct a preliminary inquiry to determine what 8 action should be taken. 9 b. Order the child subject to the complaint to be screened 10 for commercial sexual exploitation using a standardized, 11 evidence-based, trauma-informed screening tool. 12 Sec. 4. Section 232.50, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 13 following new subsection: 14 NEW SUBSECTION . 3A. Prior to the final dispositional 15 hearing of a child, the court shall require a substance use 16 disorder screening of the child. 17 Sec. 5. Section 232.71B, subsection 1, paragraph a, 18 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as 19 follows: 20 If the department determines a report constitutes a child 21 abuse allegation, the department shall promptly have the child 22 subject to the child abuse allegation screened for commercial 23 sexual exploitation using a standardized, evidence-based, 24 trauma-informed screening tool, and shall commence either a 25 child abuse assessment within twenty-four hours of receiving 26 the report or a family assessment within seventy-two hours of 27 receiving the report. 28 Sec. 6. Section 614.8, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 29 to read as follows: 30 2. Except as provided in section 614.1, subsection 9 , or 31 section 614.8A, the times limited for actions in this chapter , 32 or chapter 216 , 659A , 669 , or 670 , except those brought for 33 penalties and forfeitures, are extended in favor of minors, 34 so that they shall have one year five years from and after 35 -2- LSB 1992HV (3) 91 as/js 2/ 8 H.F. 908 attainment of majority within which to file a complaint 1 pursuant to chapter 216 , to make a claim pursuant to chapter 2 669 , or to otherwise commence an action. 3 Sec. 7. Section 614.8A, Code 2025, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 614.8A Damages Commencement of action for child or minor 6 sexual abuse or human trafficking ââ time limitation. 7 1. Notwithstanding section 614.8, subsection 2, and the 8 times limited for actions in this chapter, the time to file 9 an action related to sexual abuse or human trafficking that 10 occurred when the injured person was a minor is extended to 11 five years beyond the minorâs attainment of eighteen years of 12 age. 13 2. An In addition to the extension of the time provided in 14 subsection 1, an action for damages for injury suffered as a 15 result of sexual abuse which or human trafficking that occurred 16 when the injured person was a child, but not discovered until 17 after the injured person is of the age of majority, shall 18 be brought within four five years from the time of discovery 19 by the injured party of both the injury and the causal 20 relationship between the injury and the sexual abuse or human 21 trafficking . 22 Sec. 8. Section 710A.1, subsection 4, paragraph a, 23 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as 24 follows: 25 âHuman traffickingâ means participating in a venture to 26 recruit, harbor, transport, supply provisions, or obtain 27 recruiting, harboring, transporting, supplying provisions to, 28 obtaining, patronizing, or soliciting a person for any of the 29 following purposes: 30 Sec. 9. Section 710A.1, subsection 10, Code 2025, is amended 31 to read as follows: 32 10. âServicesâ means an ongoing relationship between a 33 person and the actor in which the person performs performing 34 activities under the supervision of or for the benefit of the 35 -3- LSB 1992HV (3) 91 as/js 3/ 8 H.F. 908 an actor, including commercial sexual activity and sexually 1 explicit performances. 2 Sec. 10. Section 725.1, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 3 2025, is amended to read as follows: 4 b. If the person who sells or offers for sale the personâs 5 services as a partner in a sex act is under the age of eighteen, 6 the county attorney may elect, in lieu of filing a petition 7 alleging that the person has committed a delinquent act, to 8 refer that person that the person shall not be arrested, 9 charged, or prosecuted for an offense under this section, but 10 instead may be taken into temporary custody under section 11 232.78 or 232.79 or shall be referred to the department of 12 health and human services for the possible filing of a petition 13 alleging that the person is a child in need of assistance. 14 Sec. 11. Section 910.1, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2025, are 15 amended to read as follows: 16 1. âCategory âAâ restitutionâ means fines, penalties, the 17 payment of crime victim compensation program reimbursements, 18 and surcharges. 19 2. âCategory âBâ restitutionâ means the contribution of 20 funds to a local anticrime organization which that provided 21 assistance to law enforcement in an offenderâs case, the 22 payment of crime victim compensation program reimbursements, 23 payment of restitution to public agencies pursuant to 24 section 321J.2, subsection 13 , paragraph âbâ , court costs, 25 court-appointed attorney fees ordered pursuant to section 26 815.9 , including the expense of a public defender, and payment 27 to the medical assistance program pursuant to chapter 249A for 28 expenditures paid on behalf of the victim resulting from the 29 offenderâs criminal activities including investigative costs 30 incurred by the Medicaid fraud control unit pursuant to section 31 249A.50 . 32 Sec. 12. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ 33 RESTORATION FACILITIES. The department of health and human 34 services shall develop a plan in consultation with nonprofit 35 -4- LSB 1992HV (3) 91 as/js 4/ 8 H.F. 908 service providers who provide restoration services to 1 victims of human trafficking to increase the availability of 2 restoration facilities and protective services available to 3 juvenile victims of human trafficking, including juvenile 4 victims who are not, at the time of victimization, either 5 a child in need of assistance or otherwise involved in 6 the juvenile court system. The department shall consider 7 developing a network with other states to provide housing 8 outside of the state for victims at risk of returning to the 9 person involved in the victimâs trafficking. The department of 10 health and human services shall present a report detailing the 11 plan to the governor and the general assembly by December 15, 12 2025. 13 Sec. 13. OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL ââ HUMAN TRAFFICKING 14 ââ APPROPRIATION. There is appropriated from the general fund 15 of the state to the office of the attorney general for the 16 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, 17 the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 18 used for the purposes designated: 19 For the creation of a joint unit involving the attorney 20 generalâs office, and the Iowa office to combat human 21 trafficking within the division of intelligence and fusion 22 center of the department of public safety, for the purpose 23 of investigating and prosecuting human trafficking cases, 24 collecting and analyzing human trafficking data, evaluating 25 the effectiveness of state-funded initiatives to combat human 26 trafficking, and working with state agencies to report data on 27 human trafficking investigations and prosecutions: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 750,000 29